src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_UʹVDDED !!= * @CODE@ uʹvdded:uvdd
+V: V0_UʹVDDED ;
LEXICON IV_UʹVDDED !!= * @CODE@ uʹvdded:uvdd
+V+IV: V0_UʹVDDED ;
LEXICON TV_UʹVDDED !!= * @CODE@ uʹvdded:uvdd
+V+TV: V0_UʹVDDED ;
LEXICON V0_UʹVDDED !!= * @CODE@ uʹvdded:uvdd

! inf: ed
! ** Yaml: __V-uvdded__
! FORMS
!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: uʹvdded
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization xyy2Vyy
:%^VOWLower%^XYY2VYY VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oudd
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization xyy2Vyy
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%^XYY2VYY%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ouʹdde
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uʹvdde
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PAL%^XYY2VY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ (5) uuʹd
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^PAL%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! uuʹdež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2VY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ooudas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: uvddu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization xyy2Vyy
:%^VOWLower%^XYY2VYY VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: ouddaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: uʹvd»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_TIEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ tieʹtted:teâtt
+V: V0_TIEʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_TIEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ tieʹtted:teâtt
+V+IV: V0_TIEʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_TIEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ tieʹtted:teâtt
+V+TV: V0_TIEʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_TIEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ tieʹtted:teâtt

! In the lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' the verb __tieʹtted__ has the form __tiõtt__
!! * Yaml: __V-tietted__
!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: tieʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teâtt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALÄ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: teäʹtˈte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tiõʹtˈte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) tieʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! tieʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: teâđas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: tiõtˈtu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: teâtˈtaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: tieʹđ»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^Allegro%^PAL%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


!+Imprt:			TIETTED-IMPRT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C K	; ! tieʹđ

+Act+PrsPrc:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%>i K ; !vuõʹlǧǧi
+Act+PrsPrc:%^PAL%>i K ; !vueʹlǧǧi




LEXICON V_SUIʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ suiʹtted:suitt
+V: V0_SUIʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_SUIʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ suiʹtted:suitt
+V+IV: V0_SUIʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_SUIʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ suiʹtted:suitt
+V+TV: V0_SUIʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_SUIʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ suiʹtted:suitt

! seek parallell in AIBBÂD
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: suiʹtted
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soitt
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: soiʹtte
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: suiʹtte
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: vueiʹn
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: suuiʹtež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ???sooitas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ???suittu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! suiʹtted:suitt
! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel raising
! NEEDS WORK
!(son soitt) ??
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !1
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !4
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !5 vueiʹnet
:%^VOWBack%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !5 vuõiʹnet
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !5 ?2 ?7
:%^XYY2XY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;
+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWBack%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>ež   K ; !6
+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>ež   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !7
:%^VOWBack VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !8



LEXICON V_VUEʹLǦǦED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹlǧǧed:vuâlgg
+V: V0_VUEʹLǦǦED ;
LEXICON IV_VUEʹLǦǦED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹlǧǧed:vuâlgg
+V+IV: V0_VUEʹLǦǦED ;
LEXICON TV_VUEʹLǦǦED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹlǧǧed:vuâlgg
+V+TV: V0_VUEʹLǦǦED ;
LEXICON V0_VUEʹLǦǦED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹlǧǧed:vuâlgg

!! 1.e.
!! 1c
!! * Yaml: __V-juekked__
! FORMS
!! XYY-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: vueʹlǧǧed
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! XYY-HighVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâlgg
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! XYY-HighVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALE%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vueʹlǧǧe
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
+Use/NG+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALÄ%^PAL%>e K ; !3

!! XYY-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuõʹlǧǧe
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! 2XY-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: vueʹlj
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! 2XY-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! vuõʹljež
+Use/NG:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; 
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, 

!! 2XY-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^XYY2XY%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: vuâlǥas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! XYY-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuõlggu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! XYY-HighVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vuâlggaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: vueʹlj»
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


LEXICON V_VUEʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹhssed:vuâhss
+V: V0_VUEʹHSSED ;
LEXICON IV_VUEʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹhssed:vuâhss
+V+IV: V0_VUEʹHSSED ;
LEXICON TV_VUEʹHSSED !!= * @CODE@ vueʹhssed:vuâhss
+V+TV: V0_VUEʹHSSED ;
