src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
njuuʹdded:njuudd V_SUIʹTTED ;
suiʹtted:suitt V_SUIʹTTED ;
tieʹtted:teâtt V_TIEʹTTED ;
tuʹvdded:tuvdd V_UʹVDDED ;
uʹvdded:uvdd V_UʹVDDED ;
vueʹlǧǧed:vuâlgg V_VUEʹLǦǦED ;
vueʹtǩǩed:vuâtkk V_VUEʹLǦǦED ;
